Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1511
Perjury and subornation; allegations; sufficiency.

In every indictment for perjury or subornation of perjury it shall be sufficient to set forth the substance of the offense charged upon the defendant, and before what court the oath or affirmation was taken, averring such court or authority to have full power to administer the same, together with the proper averment or counts to falsify the matter or matters wherein the perjury is assigned, without setting forth any part of any record or proceeding, in law or equity, other than as aforesaid, and without setting forth the commission or authority of the court, or other authority before whom the perjury was committed.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 422, p. 818;

R.S.1913, § 9060;

C.S.1922, § 10084;

C.S.1929, § 29-1511;

R.S.1943, § 29-1511.

To sustain information charging perjury, alleged false testimony must be in respect to matter material in action in which given. Shevalier v. State, 85 Neb. 366, 123 N.W. 424 (1909).

Applied to all cases where grand juries were required before act took effect. Jones v. State, 18 Neb. 401, 25 N.W. 527 (1885).